Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Chief Operating Office .......... $ 287,178
(2) Court appointed special
advocates .............................. $ 6,300,000
(3) Oregon Public
Broadcasting ......................... $ 521,000
(4) Oregon Historical Society ..... $ 781,500
(5) State Fair Council ................. $ 1,057,942
(6) Debt service .......................... $ 2,832,316
(7) Enterprise Goods and
Services:
(a) For the payment of state
legal costs related to
sections 1 and 2, chapter
105, Oregon Laws 2022 .......... $ 3,983,616
(b) For the payment of court
awarded compensation and
reasonable attorney fees
related to sections 1
and 2, chapter 105,
Oregon Laws 2022 ................. $ 18,300,000
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the following purposes:
(1) Chief Operating Office .......... $ 14,094,212
Enrolled House Bill 5002 (HB 5002-A) Page 1
(2) Chief Financial Office ........... $ 33,674,580
(3) Office of the State Chief
Information Officer:
(a) Policy .................................... $ 112,278,023
(b) Microsoft 365......................... $ 63,826,322
(4) Chief Human Resources
Office..................................... $ 28,965,652
(5) Office of the State Chief
Information Officer
- State Data Center:
(a) Operations............................. $ 144,833,003
(b) Pass-through expenditures ... $ 2,488,298
(c) Equipment lifecycle
replacement .......................... $ 21,669,928
(6) Workday Oregon ................... $ 42,142,472
(7) Enterprise Asset
Management.......................... $ 122,501,283
(8) Enterprise Goods
and Services .......................... $ 161,117,563
(9) Business Services .................. $ 31,933,778
(10) Capital improvements ........... $ 4,935,852
(11) Principal and interest
payments for outstanding
Article XI-O bonds ................ $ 544,178,474
(12) Treasury fees ........................ $ 492,742
(13) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
debt service........................... $ 34,267,122
(14) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
information technology ......... $ 22,596,577
(15) Special governmental
payments............................... $ 300,000
(16) Court Appointed Special
Advocates.............................. $ 199,833
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$53,912,517 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services from lottery
moneys allocated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund for debt
service and related costs for bonds issued in previous biennia.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,744,348 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses to support the county fairs in this state from lottery moneys allocated
from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services that are  deposited in the County Fair Account established under
ORS 565.445.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,372,803 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the Chief Financial Office.
Enrolled House Bill 5002 (HB 5002-A) Page 2
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$163,911,525 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services for purposes  other than those specified in section 5
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the following expenditures by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Insurance Fund for acquiring and purchasing  insurance or
reinsurance, allocating and collecting premiums and paying claims  for coverage pursuant to
statutory authority.
(2) Expenditures from the Mass Transit Assistance Account for payments  described in
ORS 291.407 to mass transit districts, transportation districts and service districts.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5002 (HB 5002-A) Page 3